Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB186.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 501(c)(5) and (e) and 502(a) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, are amended and the sections are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 501. Determination of Compensation Appeals.--* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 (c) * * *(5) If an employer files with the department such information more than [twenty-one] thirty days after the "Determination Date" provided on the notice required under section five hundred one (a) or the "Notice Date" provided on the notice required under section five hundred one (b), the department shall only issue to such employer (i) a notice in writing of its determination with respect to each claim which is filed by the claimant for a week, the first day of which is within the thirty-day period which immediately precedes the date on which such information is filed, and (ii) a notice in writing of its determination with respect to the first valid claim which is filed by the claimant during the claimant's benefit year for a week, the last day of which is subsequent to the date on which such information is filed.* * *(d.1) For any revision that results in the "Determination Date" provided in the original notice given to any employer or claimant being more than one year prior to the "Determination Date" on the revised notice under subsection (d), the employer or claimant shall have sixty calendar days to file an appeal under this section.(e) Unless the claimant or last employer or base-year employer of the claimant files an appeal with the board, from the determination contained in any notice required to be furnished by the department under section five hundred and one (a), (c) and (d), except as provided under subsection (d.1), no later than [twenty-one] thirty calendar days after the "Determination Date" provided on such notice, and applies for a hearing, such determination of the department, with respect to 20250HB0186PN0133 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the particular facts set forth in such notice, shall be final and compensation shall be paid or denied in accordance therewith.* * *(g) If the deadline for an employer or claimant to file an appeal under this section occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday, the deadline shall be extended to the next business day.Section 502. Decision of Referee; Further Appeals and Reviews.--(a) Where an appeal from the determination or revised determination, as the case may be, of the department is taken, a referee shall, after affording the parties and the department reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing, affirm, modify, or reverse such findings of fact and the determination or revised determination, as the case may be, of the department as to him shall appear just and proper. The parties and their attorneys or other representatives of record and the department shall be duly notified of the time and place of a referee's hearing and of the referee's decision, and the reasons therefor, which shall be deemed the final decision of the board, unless an appeal is filed therefrom, no later than [twenty-one] thirty days after the "Decision Date" provided on such decision or the board acts on its own motion, to review the decision of the referee. The testimony at any hearing before a referee shall be taken by a recording device and be preserved for a period of ninety days following expiration of the period for filing an appeal from the final decision rendered in the case. An unabridged transcript and audio recording of the testimony shall be made available, at cost if not used for unemployment compensation purposes or a subsequent appeal, to the parties and their attorneys or other 20250HB0186PN0133 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 representatives upon written request to the referee.* * *(c) If the thirty-day deadline to file an appeal under subsection (a) occurs on a Saturday, Sunday or a legal holiday, the deadline shall be extended to the next business day.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0186PN0133 - 4 - 123456